<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88512-0027 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.5-12-88.f2.A1026</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="52">12 CFR Parts 615 and 618</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Funding and Fiscal Affairs, Loan Policies and Operations, and FundingOperations; General Provisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Farm Credit Administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Proposed rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Farm Credit Administration (FCA) proposes for commentan amendment to 12 CFR Part 615, Subpart H that establishes minimum permanentcapital standards for Farm Credit System (System) institutions. The amendmentimplements section 301(a) of the Agricultural Credit Act of 1987, whichdirects the FCA to issue regulations under section 4.3(a) of the Farm CreditAct of 1971, establishing minimum permanent capital standards expressedas a ratio of capital to assets that takes into account relative risk factors.The regulation provides for a relative weighting of assets on the basisof risk and establishes a minimum ratio of permanent capital to weightedassets that would be phased in over 5 years. The proposed regulation alsosets forth the factors that should be considered in developing plans toachieve capital adequacy for each Farm Credit System institution. The FCAproposes to remove existing andSection; 615.5210 and add it to Part 618 asandSection; 618.8440. The FCA also proposes to remove and reserve andSection;andSection;615.5220 and 615.5240 of Subpart I, which set forth debt to capital ratiosrequired under prior law. The FCA withdraws capital adequacy regulationsthat were published for comment on July 23, 1986 (51 FR 26402), prior tothe enactment of the 1987 Act. These proposed regulations would have theeffect of requiring System institutions to meet the minimum permanent capitaladequacy levels specified in the regulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>Comments must be submitted on or before June 10, 1988.A public hearing is scheduled for June 9, 1988. See the ``Final Noticeof Hearings'' published elsewhere in this issue of the <T4>Federal Register.</T4></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>Comments and requests to testify may be mailed (intriplicate) to Anne E. Dewey, General Counsel, Farm Credit Administration,1501 Farm Credit Drive, McLean, VA 22102-5090. Copies of all communicationsreceived will be available for examination by interested parties in theOffice of General Counsel, Farm Credit Administration. For address of publichearings see the ``Final Notice of Hearings'' published elsewhere in thisissue of the <T4>Federal Register</T4>.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2><ITAG tagnum="15">William G. Dunn, Chief, Financial Analysis and Standards Division,Farm Credit Administration, 1501 Farm Credit Drive, McLean, VA 22102-5090,(703) 883-4402,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">   or</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Dorothy J. Acosta, Senior Attorney, Office of General Counsel, FarmCredit Administration, 1501 Farm Credit Drive, McLean, VA 22102-5090, (703)883-4020, TDD (703) 883-4444.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>On July 23, 1986, the Farm Credit Administration(FCA) published for comment proposed regulations (51 FR 26402) relatingto capital adequacy and minimum capital for Farm Credit System (System)institutions pursuant to section 4.3(a) of the Farm Credit Act of 1971(1971 Act), 12 U.S.C. 2154. The proposed regulation would have establishedregulatory zones based on capital levels, within which System institutionswould have been authorized to take a number of actions that previouslyrequired FCA approval. Such actions included the establishment of interestrates, payment of dividends and distribution of earnings. On October 16,1986, the FCA published for comment proposed conforming amendments to Parts614 and 615 (capital adequacy related regulations) (51 FR 36824).On January 6, 1988, the Agricultural Credit Act of 1987, Pub. L. 100-233(1987 Act) was enacted, amending the 1971 Act to alter significantly thecapital structure of Farm Credit banks and associations and to delete manypreviously required prior approvals by the FCA. System banks and associationshave greater flexibility to determine their capital structure and developsources of ``at-risk'' capital than they previously had. In addition, the1987 Act makes significant structural changes in the System, requiringmergers among the Federal land banks (FLBs) and the Federal intermediatecredit banks (FICBs) in each district and permitting mergers among allbanks within a district, among banks for cooperatives (BCs), among productioncredit associations (PCAs), and Federal land bank associations (FLBAs)within a district, and between certain institutions in different districts.In addition, Federal land bank associations may become direct lenders.As a result of these statutory changes, described more fully below, theFCA has determined that the capital adequacy regulations proposed for commenton July 23, 1986, are no longer appropriate and hereby withdraws them.The capital adequacy related regulations are similarly affected and theFCA will determine in the near future what adjustments need to be madein the current regulations and the proposed amendments.<ITAG tagnum="84">I. Agricultural Credit Act of 1987 (1987 Act)</ITAG>The 1987 Act makes significant changes in the capital structure of FarmCredit banks and associations (collectively ``institutions''). New capitalizationbylaws are required to be developed implementing the statutory changes.See section 301(b) of the 1987 Act. The bylaws do not require FCA priorapproval, but must enable the institution to meet the minimum capital adequacystandards established by the FCA and must have majority stockholder approval.The statutory requirement to purchase stock is reduced from 5 percent to2 percent of $1,000, whichever is less, although the institution may requiremore under its bylaws. Such stock need not be retired upon repayment ofthe loan or otherwise at the option of the borrower; retirement must besolely at the discretion of the board of directors. No retirement can bemade unless the institution meets the minimum capital adequacy standardsestablished by the FCA under section 4.3(a) of the 1971 Act. Voting stockmay only be held by borrowers who are farmers, ranchers, producers or harvestersof aquatic products, and eligible cooperatives; non-voting stock may beissued to non-borrowers. Voting stock must be converted to non-voting stockwithin 2 years of loan repayment. All stock is freely transferable.A distinction is made between the new ``at-risk'' stock and ``eligibleborrower stock,'' which is protected from impairment. Section 201 of the1987 Act amends the 1971 Act to add a new section 4.9A, which requiresthe institution to retire such protected ``eligible borrower stock'' atpar value upon repayment of the loan, whether or not such stock is impaired.Section 201 also provides for such impairments to be cured with Federalfinancial assistance, which is exchanged for preferred stock issued tothe Farm Credit System Assistance Corporation, an entity created by the1987 Act. ``Eligible borrower stock'' is defined as stock, participationcertificates and allocated equities, issued or allocated to persons otherthan Farm Credit System institutions, and which was outstanding on thedate of enactment or issued after enactment as a condition of obtaininga loan but before the earlier of 9 months from enactment or the date theinstitution adopts capitalization bylaws under the 1987 Act. The bylawsmust require holders of eligible borrower stock to exchange a portion ofit for new, at-risk stock.Section 4.3(a) of the 1971 Act, added in 1985, requires the FCA to adoptminimum capital standards for Farm Credit System institutions and empowersthe FCA to issue directives to institutions that fail to maintain capitalat or above the minimum standard, in addition to any other enforcementpowers available to the FCA. Such directives may require the institutionto develop and adhere to a plan that would enable the minimum capital standardto be met. In addition, the FCA is allowed, in its discretion, to considersuch a failure an unsafe and unsound condition and to consider the institution'sprogress toward meeting the standard when considering whether to give priorapprovals required under the 1971 Act to any proposal to divert earningsor otherwise impede the institution's progress in meeting its minimum capitallevel. Section 4.3(b)(3); 12 U.S.C. 2154.While the 1987 Act eliminated many required prior approvals by the FCA,the provisions of section 4.3(a) of the 1971 Act were not changed. However,section 301(a) of the 1987 Act directs the FCA to issue regulations undersection 4.3(a) establishing for Farm Credit System institutions minimum``permanent capital'' standards that specify fixed percentages representingthe ratio of permanent capital of the institution to the assets of theinstitution, taking into consideration relative risk factors, as determinedby the FCA. Minimum permanent capital standards are required to be phasedin over a 5-year period and must be based on financial statements of theinstitutions prepared in accordance with generally accepted accountingprinciples (GAAP).``Permanent capital'' is defined as ``current year retained earnings, allocatedand unallocated earnings, all surplus (less allowances for losses), andstock issued by a System institution, except stock that_(A) May be retired by the holder thereof on repayment of the holder's loan,or otherwise at the option or request of the holder; or(B) Is protected under section 4.9A or is otherwise not at risk.''</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Section 4.3A(a)(1) of the 1971 Act, added by section 301(b) of the1987 Act. ``Stock'' is defined to mean ``voting and nonvoting stock (includingpreferred stock), equivalent contributions to a guaranty fund, participationcertificates, allocated equities, and other forms and types of equities.''Section 4.3A(a)(2) of the 1971 Act, as amended.The effect of these definitions is to include within permanent capitalall capital in System institutions except that which is protected undersection 4.9A of the 1971 Act, as amended, or is otherwise not at risk,and that which must be retired upon repayment of the loan or otherwiseat the option of the borrower.In response to the statutory directive to issue regulations under section4.3(a) of the 1971 Act establishing minimum permanent capital standards,the FCA issued an Advance Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (ANPRM) on February17, 1988 (53 FR 4642), requesting comment on a proposed approach that wouldbe similar to the risk-adjusted capital proposals of other Federal bankregulatory agencies and on a number of related issues. The comment periodclosed on March 1, 1988.Comments were received from the Farm Credit Corporation of America (FCCA)on behalf of the 37 Farm Credit banks, several individual Farm Credit districts,a number of production credit associations and Federal land bank associations,the American Bankers Association, the United States League of Savings Institutions,and the National Farmers Union. A summary of the issues raised in the ANPRMand the comments received follows.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Summary of Comments</ITAG>A. Level of Required Minimum Permanent CapitalThe FCA stated in the ANPRM that capital must be sufficient to protectinvestors, minimize the risk of insolvency and provide for current andfuture needs, including protection against risks inherent in concentrated,single-industry lending in fixed geographic territories, and that minimumcapital ratios should generally be higher than those set or proposed formore diversified financial institutions.Two Farm Credit districts, the American Bankers Association and the UnitedStates League of Savings Institutions supported the FCA's contention thatcapital levels should be generally higher for single-industry lenders witha lack of geographic diversification. One Farm Credit district assertedthat capital levels even far in excess of those now proposed for diversifiedfinancial institutions would not have been adequate to allow a number ofSystem institutions to survive without assistance from inside and outsidethe System.The National Farmers Union agreed that single-industry lending in fixedgeographical territories poses greater risk that those faced by diversifiedfinancial institutions, but voiced concern that higher capital standardswould result in higher interest rates to borrowers, which would resultin borrower flight from the System.The FCCA did not agree that capital standards for Farm Credit institutionsshould be higher than for commercial banks. The FCCA argued that Systeminstitutions have less liquidity risk than commercial banks because ofthe System's status as a ``sponsored'' agency with access to the financialmarkets not available to commercial banks, the protection afforded debtholdersby joint and several liability, the active secondary market in System debtissues, the easier access to liquidity through Federal Reserve purchaseof debt issues, and the absence of demand deposits. In addition, the FCCAargued that commercial banks have more payment system risk, more countryrisk, more single borrower lending concentrations and a lower percentageof collateralized loans. The FCCA pointed out that other ``sponsored''agencies, such as the Federal National Mortgage Association, are capitalizedat lower rates than commercial banks because of their limited liquidityrisks and that the Farm Credit System Insurance Corporation (created bysection 302 of the 1987 Act) will provide greater protection for ``insured''System liabilities than do Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation assetsfor insured commercial deposits. (After January 6, 1989, System debt issuanceswill be considered ``insured'' pursuant to section 302 of the 1987 Act.)The FCCA also argued that the need to be competitive imposes a practicallimit on the amount of permanent capital that can be accumulated, inasmuchas the cost of accumulating new capital would either be passed on to borrowersin the form of higher interest rates or would reduce capital that couldotherwise be accumulated, or both. Finally, the FCCA asserted that theagricultural industry is extremely diversified with a broad variety ofproducts, market factors and economic conditions. Several commenters statedthat the mergers of the Federal land banks and the Federal intermediatecredit banks would result in wider diversification in the resulting FarmCredit banks than has existed heretofore.The FCCA suggested that a minimum permanent capital standard in the rangeof 3 to 4 percent be established for all System banks and associations.One Farm Credit district suggested that institutions be expected to achievea 3 percent ratio by the end of the second year of the phase-in periodand 4 percent by the fifth year. Another believed that the rate shouldbe higher than the 4 percent core capital ratio proposed by the other regulators.An association suggested that 5\1/2\ percent would be an appropriate ratio.Several commenters urged the FCA not to respond to the System's single-industrylending status and the adversity of the last 4 years with excessive capitalrequirements in the belief that the System could have weathered the recentadversity had its capital levels been high enough. To do so, it was argued,would be self-defeating to the System in its attempt to obtain new capital,in that institutions would be unable to pay a return to providers of capitaland would be forced to charge uncompetitive rates to borrowers.Several commenters stated that the FCA must take into account the factthat the allowance for losses is excluded from the statutory definitionof permanent capital in the 1987 Act, while other regulators include thegeneral portion of the allowance in the capital base. One commenter statedthat Farm Credit System institutions should be allowed to do the same inorder to be competitive with commercial banks. One commenter asserted that,if the risks in the loan portfolio are properly identified and the allowancefor losses is adequate, System institutions carry proportionately fewerrisk assets on their balance sheets than do more diversified institutions,since the remainder of the PCA's assets are invested in the FICB and infacilities and equipment used in the operation of the business.One commenter opined that there should be local participation in establishingminimum permanent capital ratios. The commenter believed that local marketsand the risk associated with specific commodities should be considered.B. Single or Multiple StandardsIn the ANPRM, the FCA invited comment on whether there should be a singlestandard for all System institutions or different standards that reflectthe different levels of risk inherent in the operations of different typesof institutions.The FCCA favored a single standard in view of the potential complexityof the prospective System structure. The FCCA believed that the differencesin risk could be addressed by risk-adjusting the assets and establishingthe allowance for losses at an appropriate level.Several other commenters supported the idea of using one standard for allinstitutions and accounting for the differences in the risk-weighting ofthe assets. One commenter suggested developing extensive and sophisticatedasset risk-weighting categories that are reflective of the structural natureof the System as it evolves under the provisions of the 1987 Act and thecollateral type and quality of the loan.On the other hand, some commenters believed that the risk-weighting ofassets would not adequately address the differences in risk evidenced bythe historical loss records of the various institutions. One commenternoted that the recent stress in the agricultural sector impacted differentinstitutions in the same district differently and that differential minimumpermanent capital standards should be established after the differenceshave been quantified and studied.A number of associations urged the FCA to consider the relationship betweenthe associations and their district banks in setting capital standards.Several commenters noted that the association's ability to meet capitalizationrequirements depends on the actions of the district banks in setting interestrates, passing operating and other costs to the association, establishingthe required investment in the bank and approving interest rates and operatingbudgets. These commenters urged the FCA to issue regulations that wouldinsure that the associations have the same opportunity to meet capitalizationstandards as do district banks.Another commenter suggested that the regulations impose restrictions onthe transfer of capital between a Farm Credit bank and its associations,which would have the effect of requiring the bank to raise capital fromoutside sources rather than through raising the cost of funds to the associations.The commenter also urged that FCA merger regulations require the mergedassociation to meet a specific capital adequacy standard upon chartering,to prevent non-viable associations from merging and utilizing capital whichwould be better utilized by viable associations, and that Farm Credit banksbe prohibited from distributing capital to merging associations that cannotmeet the capital adequacy standards. One commenter noted that the capital adequacy ratios should logically dependin large part upon what the FCA and System institutions envision the futurefunctions of bank and associations to be. The commenter stated that theCongressional intent evident in the new legislation to decentralize moreresponsibility to associations is likely to result in System institutionsthat are not as closedly tied together as vertically integrated financialintermediaries as they have been in the past. The commenter, therefore,suggested that a flexible treatment of capital necessary to offset risksinvolved in asset liability management may be needed, as well as higherlevels of capital to compensate for the loss of the protective supervisionof Farm Credit banks. These changes, the commenter suggested, argue fordifferential capital levels. An association that if fully involved in assetliability management may need more stringent liquidity policies and procedures,and also more capital, than the association that simply discounts mostof its assets with an intermediary wholesaler such as a Farm Credit bank.One commenter urged the FCA to require disclosure of the current year'sratio of income to capital as well as the three previous year's ratiosand projections for the next 3 years. 3. Risk-Based Capital Approach In the ANPRM, the FCA stated its intention to consider the adoption ofa risk-based approach similar to the proposed Interagency Guidelines publishedon March 15, 1988, by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System(Federal Reserve), the Comptroller of the Currency (Comptroller) and theFederal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC), (53 FR 8550) modified toreflect the relative risk factors inherent in the System institutions andthe unique nature of permanent capital, as defined by the 1987 Act. TheInteragency Guidelines are based on several years of study and are intendedto promote the stability of the banking system and bring some degree ofuniformity to capital standards so that there is competitive equity amonginstitutions subject to the oversight of different regulators. Under the Interagency Guidelines, assets would be assigned to categoriesranging from 0 to 100 prcent according to the risk inherent in the particulartype of asset. Assets assigned to the 0 percent category would be deemedto present no risk and would be excluded from the asset base altogetherfor the purpose of determining the institution's permanent capital ratio.Assets having the greatest risk would be assigned to the 100 percent categoryand the full face amount of the asset would be included in the asset base.Assets having intermediate degrees of inherent risk would be assigned tointermediate percentage risk categories and the face amount of the assetincluded in the asset base to the extent of the assigned percentage. Theinstitution's permanent capital would then be divided by the institution'srisk-adjusted asset base to arrive at the permanent capital ratio, whichwould be expressed as a percentage. The Interagency Guidelines utilize two measures for commercial banks: (1)``tier one,'' core capital; and (2) ``tier two,'' total capital, whichincludes core capital plus certain elements of supplementary capital. Corecapital consists of stockholder's equity (common stock, surplus, and retainedearnings_including disclosed capital reserves that represent an appropriationof retained earnings, net of Treasury stock and foreign currency translationadjustments); minority interest in common stockholder's equity accountsof unconsolidated subsidiaries; and, during the transition period, certainsupplementary capital elements. Supplementary capital consists of the generalallowance for losses on loans and leases; perpetual and long-term preferredstock (original maturity of at least 20 years); hybrid capital instruments_includingperpetual debt, mandatory convertible securities and subordinated debt;and intermediate term preferred stock (original maturity of 7 years ormore). Many commenters supported the use of risk-adjusted capital standards similarto those used by other regulators. The FCCA noted that the substantiveresearch, discussion, and agreement among Federal banking regulators makeit an appropriate model for the System and that such an approach is consistentwith the Congressional intent underlying section 301. The FCCA propooseda risk-weighting of assets that is similar to that used in the InteragencyGuidelines, with some modifications for assets unique to the System. Forexample, the FCCA proposed that investments in System institutions be risk-weightedat 0 percent and that loans to System be risk-weighted at 75 percent. TheFCCA argued that such assets have less exposure to loss than loans andassets generally by reason of the unique protective devices available currentlyand prospectively to System institutions, such as joint and several liability,the availability of financial assistance through the Farm Credit SystemAssistance Board, and the protection to be provided through the Farm CreditSystem Insurance Corporation. The FCCA favored a single measure of minimum capital over the two-tierapproach of the Interagency Guideline. One Farm Credit district urged theFCA not to use a standard based on a ratio of unallocated surplus to assets.However, several commenters suggested that the regulatory standards developedby the FCA be treated as minimum guidelines and that the institution beheld accountable for maintaining ``appropriate levels'' of capitala, whichmay be in excess of the regulatory minimum. The American Bankers Association (ABA) urged the FCA to monitor the progressof the risk-based capital proposals of the other regulators to ensure thatthe regulations adopted by FCA at least meet the standards for commercialbanks and included its comments on the risk-based capital proposals ofthe other regulators. The ABA's comments were generally critical of theproposals of the other regulators as a mandatory approach and urged theother regulators to allow the industry to develop risk-based capital guidelines.D. Off-Balance-Sheet Items In the ANPRM, the FCA stated its intention to require capital support forcertain off-balance-sheet items, such as undisbursed commitments, lettersof credit, and similar obligations that have some risk, by assigning themsome weight for inclusion in the risk-adjusted asset base. Comments received on weighting off-balance-sheet items were generally supportive.One commenter favored including undisbursed commitments only if they cannotbe withdrawn. The FCCA stated that the weighting of off-balance-sheet itemsshould be consistent with the Interagency Guidelines, but that only amount-specificcommitments should be risk-weighted. For example, commitments under jointand several liability and loss sharing agreements or guarantees shouldbe specifically excluded until such time as events occur that define theamount, as determined under GAAP, of the commitments.  E. Phase-In Period In the ANPRM, the FCA stated its intention to propose interim target ratioswhich would be greater each year until the fifth year when the minimumpermanent capital standard must be met and to prohibit the payment of dividendsand patronage until the fifth year standard is met. The FCCA noted that during the first 5 years certain System banks and associationsmay need to rely upon retained earnings as the primary method of accumulatingpermanent capital to meet minimum capital adequacy standards and that anumber of institutions may be unable to accumulate sufficient permanentcapital within the next 5 years to meet the standard, even if they arewell managed. The FCCA suggested that the FCA periodically conduct an institution-by-institutionevaluation of progress in meeting the capital adequacy standard and establishregulatory oversight accordingly, giving considerable weight to the trendin accumulation of capital in addition to the absolute level attained.The FCCA recognized that regulatory enforcement action is both necessaryand appropriate where the standard has not been met during the phase-inperiod and cannot be realistically projected in a sound business plan,but suggested that no regulatory action be taken against an institutionthat is effectively managed and has a total capital (including protectedstock) of greater than 3 percent of weighted risk assets and a positivetrend in the accumulation of permanent capital, even though the minimumpermanent capital standard has not yet been met. This approach contemplatesthat the FCA and each institution would negotiate a trend line (not necessarilylinear) with the objective of meeting the capital adequacy standard, evenif doing so requires longer than a 5-year period. The FCCA and a number of other commenters urged the FCA to reconsider itsintention to prohibit the payment of patronage refunds or dividends untilthe final minimum standard is met. It was argued that such a prohibitionwill make it difficult for Farm Credit System institutions to develop sourcesof capital other than required borrower capital and, to the extent borrowershave anticipated such distributions as a reduction of their borrowing costs,may cause borrower flight from System institutions. The FCCA proposed analternative by which a System institution is allowed to pay patronage refundsand dividends as long as the interim targets negotiated between the institutionand the FCA are met. Several commenters agreed with this proposal. Onecommenter noted that the association might be able to get borrowers toconvert protected stock to new, at-risk stock if the customers were assuredof getting a return on their investment. One Farm Credit district urged that phase-in regulations be specific enoughto avoid subjective judgments by the FCA, with quantifiable measures andstandards established through regulation, and that the institution's capitalmanagement not be hampered by an ``all or none'' philosophy for paymentof dividends and patronage except in circumstances where there is a safetyand soundness issue. Several associations requested that the FCA, in establishing interim standards,take into account non-recurring events that temporarily distort the capitalon an institution, such as the significant adverse impact of the Tax ReformAct of 1986 on production credit associations that had substantial loanloss reserves. Commenters were generally supportive of requiring a plan during the phase-inperiod to achieve the minimum permanent capital standard. One commenternoted that such plans should address dividends and endorsed the componentsof the financial plan that was required in the capital adequacy regulationsproposed by the FCA on July 23, 1986. One commenter believed that planswould be particularly helpful ``during the interim period in which FCAprohibited from taking certain regulatory actions solely because of thefailure of institutions to meet minimum adequacy standards.'' This commenterbelieved that the requirement should be lifted when the minimum capitalrequirement is met and as long as it is maintained. F. Treatment of Equities In the ANPRM, the FCA stated its intention to eliminate ``double duty dollars''in the computation of the permanent capital ratio. ``Double duty dollars''is a term that refers to the use of one dollar of real capital to supporttwo credit risks. The FCCA encouraged the continued use of ``double duty dollars,'' statingthat such continuation would be consistent with the requirements undersection 301(a)(1)(b) of the 1987 Act and GAAP. The FCCA stated that theuse of double duty capital encourages the generation of earnings at thediscount lenders level, with benefits passed to the direct lenders throughthe cooperative patronage refund process, thus providing an equity baseat the bank level to support its potential obligations under joint andseveral liability, as well as any secondary risk in its discount lendingoperation. The FCCA stated, however, that if there were to be an adjustmentfor double duty dollars to the extent that capital is counted only once,the capital should support those assets to which the primary risk appliesand that the assets to which a secondary risk applies (i.e. the bank'sloan to the association) should be risk-weighted at 0 percent. Two districts and one association favored eliminating the double duty dollar.One district cited analogies to the treatment of unconsolidated subsidiariesand reciprocal holdings by the Interagency Group. Another district suggestedthat elimination of the double duty dollar might be accomplished by lookingat a Farm Credit bank and its related associations as a combined entityfor the purpose of determining the capital requirements, since it may bedifficult to allocate the capital between the bank and association. Anassociation suggested that the Farm Credit banks pay out any future earningsdistribution in cash, noting the tax consequences of such a change, butalso noting that such a method would eliminate the current complicatedaccounting practice. All of the commenters who commented on the issue favoredconcentrating the capital at the direct lender level where the primaryrisk resides. In the ANPRM, the FCA also stated that equities that will be paid to borrowersin accordance with revolvement policies that entitle the shareholder toa specific payout at a specific time should not be considered as permanentcapital. The FCCA stated its belief that the only allocated equities that shouldbe excluded from the determination of permanent capital are ``allocatedequities that were outstanding of the date of enactment of the 1987 Actand `protected' under section 4.9A of the 1971 Act, as amended by the 1987Act, and allocated equities (in a specific dollar amount) that will beretired on a date certain by reason of a specific action of the board ofdirectors of the System institution authorizing such specific retirement.''The FCCA stated that until such time as a board of directors establishesa date certain claim against allocated equities, such equities are at riskand should be considered permanent capital. One Farm Credit district opined that the statute means for certain allocatedequities that were revolved only by unilateral action of the System institution'sboard of directors to be considered at risk and therefore ``permanent capital.''Several commenters, including the FCCA, urged the FCA to allow institutionsto count certain elements that are not considered permanent capital underthe 1987 Act, such as the allowance for losses and protected equities,in computing their permanent capital ratios, at least during the phase-inperiod. One commenter suggested that protected equities might be discountedin some manner to reflect their ``demand character.'' G. Average Daily Balances In the ANPRM, the FCA stated its expectation that the standards would beapplied on the basis of daily average balances of the relevant accountsfor each calendar quarter. Most commenters believed that it would be difficult and costly for manyinstitutions to close their books on a daily basis in order to comply,and that the cost would outweigh the benefits to be achieved. The FCCAnoted that the seasonal variation and other loan volume trends of Systeminstitutions may cause a significant distortion in the amount of capitalrequired, even on a quarterly basis, and that such distortions may causeoverstatements in some cases and understatements in others of capital requiredagainst risk-adjusted assets. The FCCA proposed that the permanent capitalratios of System institutions be calculated as of the last day of eachcalendar quarter. One district suggested that the standards be applied on the basis of a12-month rolling average of month-end figures if 12-month daily averagesare not considered feasible. One association indicated that daily averageswould presently be a burdensome requirement, but that if given sufficienttime, the capacity to obtain daily average balances could be acquired.H. Public Hearing The FCA invited comment on whether a public hearing would contribute tothe thorough airing of issues related to capital adequacy. The responseto this invitation was positive. One commenter suggested that hearingsshould be held in different parts of the country. Another suggested thata two-way discussion format be used for the hearing. Another requestedthat the full range of capital-adequacy-related issues be addressed.I. Other CommentsThe FCCA noted that section 6.9(e)(3)(D) [probably intended to be (B)]of the 1971 Act, added by section 201 of the 1987 Act, requires a treatmentof the third quarter 1986 capital preservation assistance liabilities thatis inconsistent with GAAP and requested a clarification that the term ``GAAP''as used in section 301(a)(1)(B) means GAAP as adjusted for many exceptionsin accordance with section 6.9(e)(3)(D) [probably B]. <ITAG tagnum="84">III. Response To Comments </ITAG>A. Capital Adequacy After careful consideration of the comments, the FCA proposes for commenta capital adequacy regulation that establishes a single risk-adjusted minimumpermanent capital standard as a baseline for capital adequacy for all FarmCredit System institutions engaged in lending or leasing. The proposedregulation is modeled after the Interagency Guidelines proposed by theother Federal regulators. The FCA believes the Interagency Guidelines arean appropriate model for risk-weighting assets, even though Farm CreditSystem instititions are cooperatively organized, inasmuch as the risksassociated with various types of assets are the same regardless of theorganizational form of the institution that holds them (although ratesshould generally be higher for single-industry lenders).The proposed minimum permanent capital standard is primarily designed toprotect against credit or counterparty risk that is interent in the investment,servicing, lending, and leasing operations of System institutions, andwhich is not accounted for by the allowance for losses. Other types ofrisk, such as interest rate, liquidity, funding, and operational risksare not fully taken into account by the minimum standard. Such risks arisingfrom management decisions made in the normal course of operations varysignificantly among institutions and will require capital levels greaterthan those required by the proposed minimum permanent capital standard.Establishment of a minimum permanent capital standard does not relievethe boards of directors and managements of System institutions from theirobligation to evaluate and determine an adequate level of total capital.Overall capital adequacy should be set at a level to provide a base forrequired growth and a buffer to protect the institution's owners and creditorsfrom future adversity. It should also provide for risks not taken intoaccount by the minimum standard. An institution's overall capital requirementscan only be determined after careful review of specific circumstances ineach individual institution, such as: quality of policies, procedures,and internal controls; capability and experience of management, quantityand quality of earnings; adequacy of the allowance for credit losses; adequacyof liquid funds; needs of the institution's customer base; and any otherrisk-oriented activities requiring additional capital. A final assessment of overall capital adequacy must take into account eachof these conditions including, in particular, the level and severity ofproblem and classified assets. The minimum permanent capital ratio proposedby the FCA is but one element in the determination of overall capital adequacy,which determination may differ significantly from conclusions that mightbe drawn solely from the institution's risk-based capital ratio. B. Single Standard for All Institutions The proposed regulation adopts a single standard for all System institutionsrather than multiple rates reflective of the different levels of risk inherentin the lending and leasing operations of the various Farm Credit Systeminstitutions. The FCA is well aware that the historical loss experienceof different types of Farm Credit System institutions varies widely andthat capital needs among institutions of the same type may differ greatlyfrom institution to institution. However, the minimum standard is intendedto provide for risks inherent in and common to lending institutions whetheror not they are organized as cooperatives. In this regard, the risk-weightingof assets allows for the single rate to have a differential impact on aninstitution-by-institution basis, inasmuch as institutions with proportionatelymore high risk assets would be required to have more capital even thoughthe rate is the same. The FCA does not propose to weight assets on the basis of the conditionor classification of the loan. These differences will be reflected in theallowance for losses, which, though not included in the computation ofthe permanent capital ratio, will affect the determination of the overallcapital adequacy of an institution. Nor does the FCA propose to attemptto weight assets on the basis of type of commodity or geographic area orlocal markets. The difficulty of making such numerous, sophisticated judgmenton these dynamic relative risk factors makes this an impracticable approach.Differences in risk exposure resulting from these factors, as well as otherrisks which may vary from institution to institution, such as interestrate, liquidity, and operational risks, must be determined and providedfor by the board of directors in determining the overall capital requirementsfor each institution. The adoption of a single minimum standard for allSystem institutions would be consistent with Interagency Guidelines onrisk-adjusted capital proposed by the Federal Reserve, the Comptroller,and the FDIC (collectively, the Interagency Group). The FCA proposes to make the Farm Credit Leasing Corporation (Leasing Corporation)subject to the proposed minimum permanent capital standards. The LeasingCorporation is exposed to risks similar to those encountered by Farm Creditbanks and associations, inasmuch as leasing is a functional equivalentof lending. If lessees fail to perform in accordance with their lease terms,the Leasing Corporation may be left holding depreciated assets of littleor no value. Because the risks are similar, the FCA proposes that the LeasingCorporation be subject to the same minimum permanent capital standardsas System banks and associations. The proposed regulation does not establish a minimum permanent capitalstandard for the Federal Farm Credit Funding Corporation, the FCCA, theFederal Agricultural Mortgage Corporation, or the Financial AssistanceCorporation, all of which are Farm Credit System institutions. Capitalstandards for these institutions must be approached differently since theyare not primarily engaged in lending and leasing operations. The FCA isconsidering what standards are appropriate for such institutions. C. Asset Risk Weights After a careful review of the asset risk-weights proposed by the InteragencyGroup and comments received on the ANPRM, the FCA has determined to proposefor comment the asset risk-weight categories developed by the InteragencyGroup of 0, 10, 20, 50 and 100 percent. The proposed weight categoriesfor risk assets are determined primarily on the basis of the type of instrumentand the type of obligor. The only forms of collateral that are formallyconsidered by the risk asset framework are obligations of the U.S. Governmentand its agencies and obligations of U.S. Government-sponsored agencies.The only guarantees that are recognized for weighting purposes are guaranteesof the U.S Government, U.S. Government-sponsored agencies, and domesticState and local governments. However, other forms of collateral or guaranteeswould be taken into account in evaluating the adequacy of an institution'sallowance for losses to properly value the credit portfolio. The allowancefor losses is expressly excluded from the statutory definition of permanentcapital in the 1987 Act. However, the adequacy of the allowance for lossesmust be addressed by the board, and management of each institution (andexamined by the FCA for adequacy) in determining the overall capital requirementsof the institution. The FCA does not agree with the FCCA that System loans and investmentsshould carry a lower risk-weight because of unique System protective devices,especially Federal financial assistance. The FCA believes that the Systemand the FCA have an obligation to make every effort to minimize the relianceon Federal assistance. Furthermore, the proposed regulation would establisha standard that the FCA believes, based on the information currently available,would be appropriate when financial assistance is terminated. Also, while``unique System protective devices'' such as joint and several liabilitymay provide risk protection to outside investors, for Farm Credit institutions,joint and several liability is an additional risk as well as a protectivedevice. For the purpose of establishing internal capital standards, theproposed regulation considers Farm Credit System institutions as independent,stand-alone, but related entities. Accordingly, the FCA did not acceptthe FCCA's suggestion to weight investments in System institutions at 0and loans to System institutions at 75. If the FCA were to accept the FCCA'ssuggestion to continue to double-count capital, the FCA would propose torisk-weight intra-System loans at 100 percent.The FCA also did not accept the FCCA's suggestion that, if double countingof capital were to be eliminated, the direct loan from banks to associationsshould be risk-weighted at 0. Such a risk-weighting would undermine theeffect of eliminating double counting of capital, since the objectionablefeature of double-counted capital is that one dollar of real capital supportstwo units of risk. While the FCA recognizes that to some extent the riskof default on the direct loan and the risk of default by borrowers arethe same risk, the FCA also believes that there is a secondary level ofrisk posed by the possibility that some associations may default for reasonsother than or in addition to the direct passthrough of loan losses andthat some cushion is needed to provide for the possibility that not allassociations will be adequately capitalized. To provide for these risks,the FCA proposes to risk-weight direct loans to and investments in otherFarm Credit System institutions at 20 percent.The treatment of off-balance-sheet items in the proposed regulation isconsistent with the Interagency Guidelines. Off-balance-sheet items wouldfirst be converted to a credit equivalent by the application of creditconversion factors that are also risk-based. For example, off-balance-sheetitems that are direct credit substitutes have a credit conversion factorof 100 percent, because the institution is subject to essentially the samecredit risk as if it had made a direct loan to the obligor or account party.Transaction-related contingencies, i.e., instruments backing the performanceof nonfinancial or commercial contracts or undertakings and undisbursedcommitments with original maturity exceeding 1 year, are subject to a 50-percentconversion factor. Short-term, self-liquidating, trade-related contingenciesthat arise from the movement of goods, such as commercial and documentaryletters of credit collateralized by the underlying shipments, are subjectto a credit conversion factor of 20 percent. Unused commitments with anoriginal maturity of 1 year or less are deemed to involve little risk andare subject to a 0-percent credit conversion factor, which results in theirrequiring no capitalization at all. After applying the credit equivalentfactor, the resulting amount is assigned to a risk-weight category or thesame bases as the balance sheet assets-type of obligor or guarantor ortype of collateral.The treatment of goodwill is also consistent with the Interagency Guidelines.Goodwill acquired after the date of publication of this proposed regulationand all goodwill on the books of the institution after January 1, 1993,would be deducted from permanent capital (and the asset base) before computingthe permanent capital ratio. This treatment is proposed because of theuncertainty of the future benefits of such an intangible asset, inasmuchas it does not involve a contractual right to receive a definite incomestream for a specified or certain period. In the event an institution experiencesfinancial difficulties, goodwill may not provide the degree of supportprovided by other assets because goodwill cannot be sold separately andbecause the entity whose acquisition gave rise to the goodwill may notbe readily marketable. However, goodwill acquired before the date of publicationof the proposed regulation would be ``grandfathered.'' Until 1993, suchgoodwill would not be deducted from permanent capital, but would be risk-weightedin the asset base at 100 percent.The proposed rule does not make any adjustments for intangible assets otherthan goodwill. Except for goodwill, there is no uniformity among the InteragencyGroup on the treatment of intangible assets. The Federal Reserve generallyevaluates intangible assets on a case-by-case basis and makes appropriateadjustments when the level or recorded value of these intangibles is inconsistentwith the organization's overall financial condition. The FDIC and the Comptrollerpermit purchased mortgage servicing rights to be considered in the computationbut allow other intangibles only on a case-by-case basis. The FCA invitescomment on the appropriate treatment of intangible assets in the computationof the permanent capital ratio.<T3>Differences from Interagency Guidelines: </T3>There are, however, severaldifferences between the proposed regulation and the Interagency Group'sproposed asset-risk weights:(1) The Interagency Group weights cash items in process of collection inthe 20-percent category; the proposed regulation assigns them to the 10-percentcategory. System institutions with these items have very low loss experience.(2) The proposed regulation makes no distinction between the U.S. Governmentor U.S. Government-agency securities with less than 90 days to maturityand those with longer maturities, as the Interagency Group does. The FCAassigns all such securities to the 10-percent category rather than the0-percent category, because short-term securities remain subject to somedegree of interest rate and market risk.D. Single Measure of Permanent Capital AdequacyThe proposed regulation does not incorporate a two-tier approach similarto the Interagency Group proposal. The Interagency Guidelines include intier two, or total capital, elements that would not fall within the statutorydefinition of permanent capital, such as the general allowance for losses,hybrid debt-equity instruments and subordinated debt. The Interagency Guidelinesalso limit such supplementary capital that can be counted toward the capitalratio to 100 percent of the core capital. Although the proposed regulationdoes not adopt a similar two-tier approach, the FCA emphasizes that theminimum permanent capital standard is a minimum and does not fully takeinto account all of the risks a particular institution may need to providefor in determining an overall adequate level of capital. Also, while theproposed rule does not distinguish between various elements of permanentcapital, the FCA encourages the accumulation of capital that is not subjectto revolvement.E. Treatment of Certain Equities1. <T3>Allocated equities: </T3>The FCA regards all allocated equities thatcan be retired only in the discretion of the board (provided minimum standardsare met) as permanent capital, as defined in the statute. However, theFCA wishes to encourage the accumulation of capital which both the institutionand the holder understand at the outset is not subject to revolvement (exceptin the absolute discretion of the board), as the FCA understands this tobe the intent of Congress in enacting the new capitalization provisionsof the 1987 Act. Therefore, the proposed regulation would not count capitalsubject to revolvement as permanent capital unless (1) the bylaws statethat such capital can be retired only at the discretion of the board andthat there is no express or implied right granted to the borrower to havethe capital retired at the end of the revolvement cycle or at any othertime; and (2) the notice of allocation contains a similar statement.The effect of this treatment would be to exclude from permanent capitalall allocated equities presently outstanding, since they would not havebeen issued under such a bylaw, with such notice to the borrower. However,all of these equities are already excluded from permanent capital undersection 4.9A of the 1971 Act, as amended by the 1987 Act.2. <T3>FLB passthrough equities: </T3>The proposed rule would also excludefrom the definition of permanent capital equities of the Federal land banks(FLBs) held by the Federal land bank associations (FLBAs) that were purchasedin connection with loans supported by stock that is retireable upon repaymentof the borrower's loan. The FCA believes that Congress intended such equitiesto be considered retireable upon repayment of the borrower's loan and thereforeexcluded from the statutory definition of ``permanent capital.'' Such equitiesrepresent a direct, dollar-for-dollar passthrough of capital purchasedby the borrower in the FLBA required by the 1971 Act prior to its amendmentin 1987. Title I of the 1971 Act, prior to its replacement by the new TitleI in the 1987 Act (which takes effect July 5, 1988), requires FLBA stockto be retired upon repayment of the loan. Section 1.16 of the 1971 Act,12 U.S.C. 2033. It has long been the practice of FLBs to retire its FLBA-ownedequities issued in connection with a particular loan when the loan is paidoff, in order to permit the FLBA to fulfill its statutory obligation toretire its borrower-owned equities. Indeed, most FLBAs would be unableto retire their protected stock without stock impairment if the FLB didnot retire the corresponding FLB stock, as most FLBAs have few earningassets and little earned net worth. If such FLB equities were to be treatedas permanent capital, the statutory prohibition against the reduction ofpermanent capital through the payment of dividends or patronage or theretirement of stock if minimum permanent capital standards are not met(see new section 4.3A(d), added by section 301(b) of the 1987 Act) wouldeffectively preclude the retirement of protected stock if the FLB did notmeet the minimum permanent capital standards. This could lead to the anomalousresult of FLBAs in relatively healthy districts seeking Federal Financialassistance, and facing insolvency if it were denied, while the FLB materiallyimproves its capital position (since it no longer has the asset to supportby retains the supporting capital).The FCA believes the 1987 Act need not and should not be interpreted toyield such an unintended result. The 1987 Act excluded from the definitionof permanent capital two categories of equities: (1) Equities protectedunder section 4.9A of the Act or otherwise not at risk; and (2) stock thatmust be retired upon repayment of the loan or otherwise at the option ofthe borrower. All borrower stock outstanding on the date of enactment andall stock issued as a condition for obtaining a loan until the earlierof the adoption of the new capitalization bylaws or 9 months from enactmentis protected and included in Category 1. Under the new bylaws, no stockwill be retireable at the option of the holder. Therefore, there are noFLBA equities that could fall into Category 2 that are not protected and,therefore, included in Category 1. The FCA has concluded that Congressmust have considered FLB equities issued to FLBAs in connection with loanssupported by protected stock to be retireable upon repayment of the loanor otherwise at the request of the holder and, therefore, excluded fromthe definition of ``permanent capital.'' To treat such equities as permanentcapital would render Category 2 a nullity and would produce a result inconsistentwith the Federal financial assistance framework set forth in the 1987 Act.3. <T3>Preferred Stock:</T3> Preferred stock is included within the statutorydefinition of permanent capital. However, the proposed rule would considerpreferred stock issued to the Financial Assistance Corporation to be permanentcapital only to the extent it is not used to offset impairment of protectedequities. To the extent it offsets such an impairment (so that all protectedequities can be retired at par in accordance with the 1987 Act), it isnot available to absorb risk. To treat such stock as permanent capitalwould undermine the clear intent of Congress to include in permanent capitalonly that capital which is available to absorb risk.F. Double Duty DollarsThe proposed regulation would eliminate ``double duty dollars'' for thepurpose of computing the permanent capital ratio. Double counting of capitalin related institutions having a direct lending or discount relationshipwould be eliminated by excluding from permanent capital of the fundinginstitution the direct lender's stock investment in the funding institution.Double counting of capital between institutions having a participationrelationship would be eliminated in the following manner: Where an institutionis required to invest in another institution in order to capitalize theparticipation interest of such other institution, the amount of such investmentwould be deducted from the permanent capital of the investing institution.For the purpose of eliminating double counting of capital only, the FLBand the FLBA would be considered to have a participation relationship.That is, the FLB would be considered to be the participating institutionand the FLBA the investing institution. Double counting of capital betweenthe Leasing Corporation and its owners would be eliminated by reducingthe permanent capital of the owners of the Leasing Corporation by an amountequal to their investment in the Leasing Corporation.The proposed regulation would also disregard any reciprocal or cross-holdingsof stock or participation certificates in the computation of permanentcapital in both institutions. These holdings are relatively rare, occurringprimarily because of FICB financial assistance to PCAs in the form of capitalinvestment. In some cases, such capital may not satisfy the definitionof permanent capital because it can be retired at the option of the holderor because it was issued with a definite retirement date. Where these holdingsdo qualify as permanent capital, they would be deducted from both the permanentcapital and the asset base of each institution prior to the computationof the permanent capital ratio and prior to the deductions required toeliminate ``double duty dollars.''The proposed approach to ``double duty dollars'' is consistent with theInteragency Guidelines. While the concept of ``double duty dollars'' hasno direct application in commercial banks, their proposed elimination wouldbe analogous to the practice of the Interagency Group of eliminating relatedcompany transactions and reciprocal equity holdings between commercialbanks prior to computing risk-adjusted capital ratios. The InteragencyGuidelines eliminate related company transactions either through consolidationor by deducting investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries from the institution'scapital before computing the minimum capital ratio. The rationale for suchtreatment of unconsolidated subsidiaries is that the assets of an unconsolidatedsubsidiary are not fully reflected in the parent's assets and ``may beviewed as the equivalent of off-balance-sheet exposures since the operationsof an unconsolidated subsidiary could expose the parent organization ** * to considerable risk.'' The Interagency Group views the capital investedin these entities as primarily supporting the risk inherent in the off-balance-sheetassets and not generally available to support risks or additional leverageelsewhere in the organization.Reciprocal holdings are also deducted from the capital bases of both institutionsunder the Interagency Guidelines. In addition, the Interagency Group furtherconsidered whether to require the deduction of all holdings in other bankssince these do not represent additional capital to the banking system asa whole and could increase the possibility that problems could be transmittedfrom one institution to another. While the Interagency Group decided notto restrict non-reciprocal holdings of capital, it was not addressing relationshipsbetween related entities. Based on these actions and comments, it is clearthat the Interagency Group would not permit the use of the same capitaltwice in two related entities.The FCA shares the concerns of the Interagency Group as they apply to Systeminstitutions and believes it is necessary to eliminate ``double duty dollars''in order to obtain an accurate picture of the System's capital positionand to assure that capital levels of all System institutions are adequate.Were ``double duty dollars'' not to be eliminated, the minimum standardwould need to be established at higher levels to compensate for the doublecounting, since one dollar of capital supports both the primary and secondarylending risk. Also, loans to System institutions would then be risk-weightedat 100 percent.The FCA believes that eliminating ``double duty dollars'' is not inconsistentwith section 301 of the 1987 Act or GAAP. The proposed elimination wouldnot reduce or not count permanent capital; it would merely avoid doublecounting the real capital that is there. Furthermore, eliminating the ``doubleduty dollars'' by treating the bank and the association as a combined entity,as suggested by one Farm Credit district, would be consistent with GAAP.Financial Accounting Standards Board Statement 12 states:<ITAG tagnum="21">There are circumstances, however, where combined financial statements(as distinguished from consolidated statements) of commonly controlledenterprises are likely to be more meaningful than their separate statements.For example, combined financial statements would be useful if one individualowns a controlling interest in several enterprises that are related intheir operations. Combined statements also would be used to present thefinancial position and the results of operations of a group of unconsolidatedsubsidiaries. They also might be used to combine the financial statementsof enterprises under common management. If combined statements are preparedfor a group of related enterprises, such as a group of unconsolidated subsidiariesor a group of commonly controlled enterprises, intercompany transactionsand profits or losses shall be eliminated, and if there are problems inconnection with such matters as minority interests, foreign operations,different fiscal periods or income taxes, they shall be treated in thesame manner as in consolidated statements.</ITAG>While the ownership structure is inverted in the Farm Credit System, thesame principles apply. Combined statements of the bank and the associationare required in reports to shareholders by 12 CFR Part 620 and are usedin Reports to Investors, both of which are required to be prepared in accordancewith GAAP. Furthermore, the FCA believes that the primary purpose of theCongressional directive to base the minimum permanent capital standardson financial statements prepared in accordance with GAAP was to assurethat capital standards would not be based on the regulatory accountingprocedures permitted under section 5.9 of the 1971 Act, 12 U.S.C. 2254.While using a combined balance sheet as a basis for computing permanentcapital ratios would eliminate ``double duty dollars,'' the FCA does notwant to obscure the fact that the institutions are independent entities.Therefore, the proposed regulation is drafted to accomplish the eliminationdirectly and to count the capital at the direct lender level, where theprimary risk resides. The FCA considered other methods of eliminating (for the purpose of computingpermanent capital ratios) the double counting of capital and/or assetsbetween institutions having a lending/investing relationship. Among themethods considered were the following: One method considered would have eliminated double-counted assets and capitaland apportioned them 75 percent to the direct lender and 25 percent tothe funding institution (the ``75/25'' approach). The assets of the fundinginstitution would be reduced by an amount equal to 75 percent of the loan(or discount) to the direct lender and the assets of the direct lenderwould be reduced by 25 percent of its indebtedness to the funding institution.Similarly, when counting capital, the funding institution would reduceits permanent capital by an amount equal to 75 percent of the direct lender'sinvestment in the funding institution and the direct lender would reduceits permanent capital and assets by an amount equal to 25 percent of itsinvestment in the funding institution. Adjustments having a similar effectwould be made for the BC/CBC system and for the Leasing Corporation. A second method considered would have eliminated double-counted capitaland assets by excluding them from consideration by the investing institution(the ``owned funds'' approach). The investing institution, when computingits permanent capital ratio, would have been required to exclude from itsassets and its capital an amount equal to its investment in its fundinginstitution. The funding institution would be permitted to include allits otherwise eligible capital. The FCA invites comments on these alternatives to the proposed approach,or others, that would eliminate double-counted dollars between institutionshaving a lending/investing relationship. G. The Minimum Permanent Capital Standard The FCA proposes to require that System institutions maintain at all timespermanent capital that is adequate for their institution, but in no caseless than 7 percent of their risk-adjusted assets. After reviewing thecomments submitted, the FCA continues to believe that concentrated, single-industrylending within limited geographic areas is inherently riskier than is themore diversified multi-industry lending that is typical of many commercialbanks. The FCA rejects the FCCA's argument that System institutions haveless risk from single borrower lending concentrations than commercial banks;few commercial banks are as dependent on the well-being of a few borrowersas are many Farm Credit System institutions. Historically, the Farm Credit System has maintained high levels of capitalrelative to commercial lending institutions. For instance, until 1971,the BCs were prohibited from exceeding debt-to-capital ratios of 13 to1 (7.1 percent). In 1982, before the magnitude of the current crisis wasfully understood, the Farm Credit System developed monitoring standardsin support of capital preservation and other loss-sharing agreements, whichset capital as a percent of total assets for Farm Credit System institutionsat levels of about 1.5 percent for FICBs, 4 percent for FLBs, 7 percentfor PCAs, and 7 percent for BCs. After risk-adjusting total assets andeliminating ``double duty dollars'' in these institutions, the proposedstandards are not substantially different. The Interagency Group has proposed a 1992 minimum capital standard withtwo components_a core capital (essentially, common stockholders' equity)standard of 4 percent, and a ``second-tier'' standard, which considersother forms of capital (including the allowance for losses) in additionto core capital, of 8 percent. These standards are intended to apply toall financial institutions in the United States and, basically, representthe minimum standards agreed to by 10 Western industrialized countries.(The United Kingdom, for comparison, has proposed minimum standards forcore capital of 8 percent for its institutions.) The FCA estimated the levels of permanent capital that would have beenrequired by various System institutions in order to have survived the stressof the last 5 years without Federal assistance and still be able to generatepositive earnings in 1992. The studies showed that the combined FLB/FLBAsystem would have needed permanent capital of about 10 percent of weightedassets_with some districts needing up to 16 percent. The FICB/PCA and BCsystems were estimated to need somewhat less, while many individual PCAsappear to need substantially more.The FCA also computed the yearend 1987 permanent capital ratios for severaldistricts with the best operating results. After combining the FLB andFICB in each district, the resulting total capital ratios ranged from 9.2percent to 15.5 percent, averaging about 12.5 percent. After double-countedcapital was eliminated, the combined banks' total capital ratios rangedfrom 6.3 percent to 9.6 percent, averaging about 8 percent. The FCA concludedthat very few, if any, institutions desiring to generate consistent netpositive earnings could operate with much less than 8 percent risk-adjustedcapital. While these calculations included stock that is now protectedunder the 1987 Act and is not permanent, eventually permanent capital willcomprise all of the institution's capital, as protected stock is replacedby new at-risk stock.After considering the proposals of the other financial regulators and theexperience of Farm Credit System institutions over the last 5 years, theFCA has concluded that 7 percent is an appropriate minimum level for allFarm Credit lending and leasing institutions. The elimination of ``doubleduty dollars'' and the risk adjusting of the assets will, of course, causethe rate to have a differential impact on the various types of institutions.The FCA believes that even with levels of permanent capital at 7 percentof weighted assets, many institutions may be undercapitalized if thereare substantial weaknesses, in their management, the terms and conditionsof their existing loans, or in the general economic condition of theirservice area. Without significant changes in their operating practices,these institutions may not be viable independent entities and may needto consider merger with stronger entities in order to continue to servicetheir territory and minimize the need for financial assistance.H. Phase-InWhile many institutions do not presently meet the proposed standard, theFCA believes that standards should be set, on a normative basis, at a levelappropriate to provide for the risks, with reasonable provision for a gradualphase-in.The proposed regulation would provide, for institutions that are unableto meet the standard in the first year, for the standard to be phased inover a 5-year period, as required by the 1987 Act. This would be achievedthrough a series of annual interim minimum permanent capital standards(interim standards) that are determined by reference to the existing permanentcapital ratio in the institution on December 31, 1987, and to the 1993standard of 7 percent. That is, the difference between the institution'sratio on December 31, 1987, and 7 percent would be divided by five to determinethe annual increments by which the interim permanent capital standard forthat institution would increase each year. This approach provides for ameasure of customization of the interim standards to the circumstancesof a particular institution. The FCA invites comment on alternative methodsfor determining appropriate increments for the annual interim minimum capitalstandards.The FCA rejects the FCCA suggestion to negotiate trend lines with eachinstitution as a substitute for interim standards, but anticipates thatsuch a process may in fact occur in the process of determining what regulatoryenforcement actions are appropriate. The FCA believes that the institution'sgood faith efforts to meet the standard and reasonable progress in doingso should be factors in determining whether regulatory enforcement actionis appropriate for an institution that does not meet the standard. TheFCA will not be inclined to bring enforcement actions against institutionsthat are making a good faith effort to meet minimum standards and are makingreasonable progress in doing so. What constitutes reasonable progress andgood faith efforts must be determined on an institution-by-institutionbasis during the course of the examination process and may in fact amountto a negotiated trend line.On the other hand, meeting the minimum capital standard does not necessarilyensure that an institution has adequate overall capital for safe and soundoperation. Where safety and soundness considerations require, enforcementactions may be appropriate even though the minimum permanent capital standardis met.The FCA wishes to clarify the statutory constraints under which the FCAmay take enforcement actions during the phase-in period, since some commentsreflect an apparent misunderstanding of these provisions. The statute doesnot prohibit enforcement actions against institutions based solely on capitaladequacy during the phase-in period. It merely requires the concurrenceof the Farm Credit System Assistance Board for such enforcement actionsagainst institutions authorized to issue preferred stock to the AssistanceBoard (i.e., institutions authorized to receive Federal financial assistance).I. Distribution of EarningsThe comments received on the distribution of earnings during the phase-inperiod were also carefully considered. A majority of the commenters urgedthe FCA to reconsider its announced intention to prohibit the payment ofdividends and patronage refunds until the fifth year minimum permanentcapital standard is met.The FCA is sympathetic with the need to offer some incentive to providersof capital in order to attract new permanent capital. On the other hand,the FCA feels an obligations to discourage the dissipation of capital ifthe effect would be to increase the need for Federal financial assistance.The FCA believes that the System has a similar obligation to minimize theneed for Federal financial assistance. However, the need to accumulatesufficient permanent capital in Farm Credit System institutions at theend of the 5-year Federal financial assistance period and the need to developsources of permanent capital (other than borrower stock required to bepurchased as a condition for the loan) have caused the FCA to reconsiderits initial position on the distribution of earnings during the phase-inperiod. Therefore, the proposed regulation would permit the payment ofdividends and patronage in any year in which the interim standard is met,provided such distribution is consistent with the capital adequacy plandeveloped by the institution. However, even if the interim standard ismet, no distributions should be made (except those permitted under section4.3A(d)(2) of the 1971 Act, as amended by section 301(b) of the 1987 Act)unless it appears reasonably probable that the institution will be ableto meet its interim standard for the next year after the distribution ismade. The FCA expects institutions to balance carefully the need to attractnew capital and prevent borrower flight against the impact of the distributionupon the institution's capital levels, to assure that the net effect ofthe action on the institution's capital levels will be positive.J. Average Daily BalanceThe proposed regulation adopts the suggestion of one Farm Credit districtthat the standard be applied on the basis of a 12-month rolling averageof month-end figures during the phase-in period, but applies the standardon an average daily balance after December 31, 1989. This would give institutionsa reasonable time to develop the capacity to close their books on a dailybasis, as do commercial banks.K. ClarificationsThe FCCA requested two clarifications. First, the FCCA requested that theFCA clarify that the reference to ``surplus (less the allowance for losses)''in the definition of permanent capital in the 1987 Act is intended to excludethe allowance for losses from the definition of permanent capital, notrequire it to be subtracted from the surplus. The confusion arises because,under GAAP, the allowance for losses is not included in the surplus account,as the statutory language would suggest, but is shown as an offset to assetaccounts. The FCA believes that the phrase ``surplus (less the allowancefor losses) should be read as ``surplus (exclusive of the allowance forlosses).''Second, the FCCA requested that the section 301(a)(1)(B) requirement toestablish minimum permanent standards based on GAAP be interpreted to mean``GAAP as adjusted by any exception in accordance with section 6.9(e)(3)(D)''[probably intended by FCCA to be B], which requires a treatment of thirdquarter 1986 capital preservation assistance liabilities that is inconsistentwith GAAP. Since there is no provision in the 1987 Act indicating thatsection 6.9(e)(3)(B) overrides section 301, a strict interpretation ofsection 301(a)(1)(B) would preclude the clarification sought by the FCCA.However, as noted above, the FCA believes that section 301(a)(1)(B) wasprimarily intended to assure that minimum permanent capital standards wouldnot be based on regulatory accounting procedures established by the 1986Act, Pub. L. 99-509, codified at 12 U.S.C. 2159, and in the absence ofan express override provision in section 301, will not interpret section301(a)(1)(B) so strictly as to yield unintended results.L. Public HearingThe FCA invited comment on whether a public hearing would be a useful meansof assuring that the issues related to capital adequacy are thoroughlyaired. The commenters who responded to this invitation agreed that it would.Accordingly, it is expected that a public hearing will be scheduled forJune 9, 1988, in the Washington, DC, area.<ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Proposed Regulation.</ITAG>The FCA proposes to amend Subpart H of 12 CFR Part 615 by removing andSection;615.5210 and adding it to Subpart J of Part 618 as andSection; 618.8440,and removing the remaining sections (615.5200 and 615.5215) in SubpartH and all sections of Subpart I in their entirety. The deleted sectionsof Subpart H, except andSection; 615.5210, are inconsistent with the proposedregulation. The deleted sections of Subpart I set forth debt-to-equityratios required of Farm Credit System institutions under prior law. TheFCA invites comment on whether some debt-to-equity standard should be requiredduring the phase-in period or until experience with the risk-adjusted capitalapproach demonstrates that it will provide an adequate control on leverage.The following new sections would be added to Subpart H:A. Proposed andSection; 615.5200 would require a Farm Credit System institutionto determine the level of capital needed to assure its continued financialviability and to provide for growth necessary to meet the needs of itsborrowers. Each institution would be required to establish a formal, writtencapital adequacy plan that, if followed, would enable the institution toachieve its operating goals as well as the minimum permanent capital standard.The plan would be required to address projected earnings distributionsand stock retirements and to take into account the capability of management,the quality and quantity of earnings, the quality of its assets and theadequacy of the allowance for losses, the sufficiency of liquid funds,the needs of an institution's customer base, and any other risk-orientedactivities, such as funding and interest rate risks, contingent and off-balance-sheetliabilities, and other conditions warranting additional capital.B. Proposed andSection; 615.5201 sets forth definitions of terms used inthe subpart. ``Institution'' is defined to include all Farm Credit banksand associations and the Farm Credit Leasing Corporation. ``Permanent capital''is defined to include all capital except stock and other equities thatmay be retired on the repayment of the holder's loan or otherwise at theoption of the holder or are protected under section 4.9A of the 1971 Act,as amended, or are otherwise not at risk. Excluded under this definitionof permanent capital would be: (1) Preferred stock issued to the FinancialAssistance Corporation to the extent it offsets an impairment of protectedequities; (2) FLB equities required to be purchased by the FLBA in connectionwith a loan supported by stock protected under section 4.9A of the Act;and (3) capital subject to revolvement unless the institution's bylawsclearly provide that such capital can be retired at the sole discretionof the board and that there is no express or implied right for such capitalto be retired at the end of the revolvement cycle or at any other time,and the notice of allocation includes a similar statement. The sectionalso defines other terms used in the computation of permanent capital ratios.C. Proposed andSection; 615.5205 requires System institutions, beginningin 1993, to maintain at all times permanent capital at a level of at least7 percent of its risk-adjusted assets. The section also sets forth themethod for determining the annual interim minimum permanent capital standardfor each institution. The difference between the institution's permanentcapital ratio on December 31, 1987, and the 7 percent standard applicablein 1993 is divided by 5 to arrive at the annual increment by which thebeginning capital ratio must increase each year in order to reach 7 percentby 1993. The interim minimum permanent capital standard for 1989 is determinedby adding the increment to the beginning permanent capital ratio. The interimminimum permanent capital standard for each year between 1989 and 1993is determined by adding the annual increment to the prior year's interimstandard.D. Proposed andSection; 615.5210 sets forth the proposed method for computingan institution's permanent capital ratio. The institution's permanent capital,(adjusted to eliminate reciprocal equity holdings between institutions,double counting of capital, and goodwill) is divided by its assets, (alsoadjusted to eliminate reciprocal holdings between institutions, and goodwill).<T3>Adjustments to permanent capital. </T3>Before the ratio is computed,certain adjustments to the permanent capital and the asset base would berequired. First, reciprocal holdings of equities between institutions wouldbe eliminated to the extent of the offset in both institutions. If theinvestments are equal in amount, the elimination would be accomplishedin each institution by deducting from permanent capital issued to anotherFarm Credit System institution an amount equal to any investment in suchinstitution and reducing assets by an equal amount. If the investmentsare not equal in amount, the permanent capital and assets of each institutionwould be reduced by an amount equal to the smaller investment.Second, double counting of capital between institutions having a directloan or discount lending relationship would be eliminated by reducing thepermanent capital of the funding institution by an amount equal to thedirect lender's investment remaining after the elimination or reciprocalholdings, if any.Third, double counting of capital between institutions having a participationrelationship would be eliminated by deducting the investment required tocapitalize the participation from the permanent capital of the investinginstitution.Fourth, double counting of capital would be eliminated between the LeasingCorporation and its owners by reducing the permanent capital of the ownerinstitutions by an amount equal to their investment in the Leasing Corporation.Fifth, the section would require institutions to reduce their permanentcapital by the amount of any goodwill reflected on the balance sheet, butwould ``grandfather'' until 1993 goodwill acquired before the date of publicationof the proposed regulation. That is, goodwill acquired before the dateof publication of the proposed regulation would be considered as an assetweighted in the 100 percent category until 1933, after which it would bededucted from permanent capital. Goodwill acquired after the date of publicationof the proposed regulation would be deducted from permanent capital (andassets).<T3>Risk-weight categories. </T3>Risk-weight categories would be definedprimarily on the basis of the type of asset and type of obligor or guarantor.Cash and claims on Federal Reserve banks would be assigned to Category1, which is risk-weighted at 0 percent. Securities of the United StatesGovernment and explicitly guaranteed United States agency securities, cashitems in process of collection, portions of loans and other assets collateralizedby securities of the United States Government or its agencies, and securitiesand other claims guaranteed by the United States Government or its agencies(including portions of claims guaranteed) are assigned to Category 2, whichis risk-weighted at 10 percent. Loans and other assets collateralized byUnited States Government-sponsored agency securities, investments in foreignbanks with an original maturity of 1 year or less, all investments in domesticbanks, investments in general obligations of State and local government,claims on official mutinational lending institutions, or regional developmentinstitutions in which the United States Government is a shareholder orcontributor are assigned to Category 3, which is risk-weighted at 20 percent.All other investment securities with maturities under 1 year are assignedto Category 4, which is risk-weighted at 50 percent. All other claims onprivate obligors, claims on foreign banks with an original maturity exceeding1 year, loans and investments in Farm Credit institutions, and all otherassets, including but not limited to fixed assets and receivables, areassigned to Category 5, which is risk-weighted at 100 percent. ``Goodwill''grandfathered under andSection; 615.5201 is risk-weighted in the 100-percentcategory until 1993, at which time it would be deducted from permanentcapital and risk-weighted in the 0-percent category.<T3>Off-balance-sheet items. </T3>Off-balance-sheet items would be risk-weightedin a two-step process. First, a credit equivalent would be obtained bymultiplying the face amount of the item by the appropriate credit conversionfactor set forth in the regulation. The resulting amount would then berisk-weighted in the same manner as balance sheet assets.Proposed credit conversion factors are set forth in the regulation. A creditconversion factor of 0 percent would be applied to unused commitments withan original maturity of 1 year or less. A credit conversion factor of 20percent would be applied to commercial letters of credit. A credit conversionfactor of 50 percent would be applied to transaction-related contingencies(i.e. bid bonds, performance bonds, warranties, and standby letters ofcredit related to a particular transaction), commitments with an originalmaturity exceeding 1 year, revolving underwriting facilities, note issuancefacilities and other similar arrangements. A credit coversion factor of100 percent would be applied to direct credit substitutes (general guaranteesof indebtedness, including standby letters of credit serving as financialguarantees for loans and securities); acquisitions of risk participationsin bankers acceptance, and participations in direct credit substitutes;sale and repurchase agreements and asset sales with recourse, if not alreadyincluded on the balance sheet; and forward agreements to purchase assets.Interest rate contracts and foreign exchange contracts would require specialtreatment to arrive at a credit equivalent amount. The institution wouldadd the current exposure, i.e. total replacement cost (obtained by markingto market) of all its contracts with a positive value and an estimate ofthe potential future credit exposure, determined by multiplying the notionalprincipal amount by one of the following credit coversion factors, as appropriate:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s20,7.1,9 </C> <H1>Remaining maturity</H1><H1>Interest rate contracts </H1><H1>Exchange rate contracts</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Less that 1 year <D>0 </D><D>1.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">One year and over <D>0.5 </D><D>5.0</D></ITAG></ITAG>No potential credit exposure would be calculated for single currency floating/floatinginterest rate swaps. The credit exposure on these contracts would be evaluatedsolely on the basis of their mark-to-market value.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 12 CFR Parts 615 and 618</ITAG>Accounting, Agriculture, Banks, Banking, Government securities, Investments,Archives and records, Insurance, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements,Technical assistance.For the reasons stated in the preamble, Parts 615 and 618 of Chapter VI,Title 12, of the Code of Federal Regulations are proposed to be amendedas follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 615_FUNDING AND FISCAL AFFAIRS, LOAN POLICIES AND OPERATIONS,AND FUNDING OPERATIONS</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 615 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>12 U.S.C. 2154, 2243, 2252, Section 301(a) of Pub.L. 100-233.</ITAG>2. Subpart H is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart H_Capital Adequacy</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">615.5200 General.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">615.5201 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">615.5205 Minimum permanent capital standards.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">615.5210 Computation of the permanent capital ratio.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">615.5215 Distribution of earnings.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart H_Capital Adequacy</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 615.5200</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General. </ITAG>(a) The Board of Directors of each Farm Credit System institution shalldetermine the amount of capital needed to assure the institution's continuedfinancial viability and to provide for growth necessary to meet the needsof its borrowers. The minimum permanent capital standard prescribed inandSection; 615.5205 is not meant to be adopted as the optimum capital levelin the institution's capital adequacy plan. Rather, the standard is intendedto serve as a minimum level of permanent capital that each institutionmust maintain to protect against the credit and other general risks inherentin its operations. (b) The Board of Directors shall establish and maintain a formal writtencapital adequacy plan as a part of the financial plan required by andSection;618.8440. The plan shall include the capital targets that are necessaryto achieve the institution's capital adequacy goals as well as the minimumpermanent capital standards. The plan shall address any projected dividends,patronage distribution, equity retirements, or other action that may decreasethe institution's permanent capital. In addition to factors that must beconsidered in meeting the minimum standards, the Board of Directors shallalso consider at least the following factors in developing the capitaladequacy plan: (1) Capability of management; (2) Quality of operating policies, procedures, and internal controls; (3) Quality and quantity of earnings; (4) Asset quality and the adequacy of the allowance for losses to absorbpotential loss within the loan and lease portfolios; (5) Sufficiency of liquid funds; (6) Needs of an institution's customer base; and (7) Any other risk-oriented activities, such as funding and interest raterisks, contingent and off-balance-sheet liabilities or other conditionswarranting additional capital.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 615.5201</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>For the purpose of this subpart, the following definitions shall apply:(a) ``Commitment'' means any arrangement that legally obligates an institutionto purchase loans or securities, to participate in loans or leases, toextend credit in the form of loans or leases, to pay the obligation ofanother, to provide overdraft, revolving credit or underwriting facilities,or to participate in similar transactions. Lending or leasing arrangementsthat are unconditionally cancellable at any time at the option of the institutionshall not be considered to be commitments, provided the institution makesa separate credit decision based upon the borrower's current financialconditions before each advance of funds or other credit under the arrangement.(b) ``Credit conversion factor'' means that number by which an off-balance-sheetitem shall be multiplied to obtain a credit equivalent before placing theitem in a risk-weight category. (c) ``Direct lender institution'' means an institution that extends creditin the form of loans or leases to eligible borrowers in its own right andcarries such loan or lease assets on its books. (d) ``Government agency'' means an agency of the United States Governmentwhose obligations are explicitly guaranteed by the United States Governmentor their successors. (e) ``Government-sponsored agency'' means agencies or instrumentalitiescharted by the United States Congress to serve a public purpose whose debtobligations are not explicitly guaranteed by the United States Government.(f) ``Institution'' means a Farm Credit bank, Federal land bank association,production credit association, Farm Credit association, Farm Credit LeasingCorporation, bank for cooperatives, and Central Bank for Cooperatives,and their successors. (g) ``Permanent capital'' means all capital except stock and other equitiesthat may be retired on the repayment of the holder's loan or otherwiseat the option of the holder, or is protected under section 4.9A of theAct, or is otherwise not at risk. For the purpose of computing the permanentcapital ratio, permanent capital shall not include: (1) Preferred stock issued to the Financial Assistance Corporation to theextent it is used to offset an impairment of equities protected under section40.9A or the Act; (2) FLB equities required to be purchased by FLBAs in connection with stockissued to borrowers that is protected under section 4.9A of the Act; (3) Capital subject to revolvement, unless: (A) The bylaws of the institution clearly provide that there is no expressor implied right for such capital to be retired at the end of the revolvementcycle or at any time; and  (B) The institution clearly states in the notice of allocation that suchcapital may only be retired at the sole discretion of the board in accordancewith statutory and regulatory requirements and that no express or impliedright to have such capital retired at the end of the revolvement cycleor at any other time is thereby granted. (h) ``Risk-adjusted asset base'' means the total dollar amount of the institution'sassets adjusted in accordance with andSection; 615.5210(d) weighted on thebasis of risk in accordance with andSection; 615.5210(e). (i) ``Stock'' means stock and participation certificates.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 615.5205</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Minimum permanent capital standards. </ITAG>(a) Beginning on January 1, 1993, each Farm Credit System institution shallat all times maintain permanent capital at a level of at least 7 percentof its risk-adjusted assets. (b)(1) During each year beginning on January 1, 1988, through January 1,1993, each institution that does not meet the minimum permanent capitalstandard established in paragraph (a) of this section shall maintain alevel of permanent capital at all times during such year at a level thatis not less than the interim minimum capital standard for such year: (2) The annual interim minimum permanent capital standards shall be determinedfor each institution in the following manner: A beginning permanent capitalratio shall be determined as of December 31, 1987. The difference betweenthe institution's beginning ratio expressed as a percentage and 7 percentshall be divided by five. The resulting number shall be the annual incrementto be used to determine the interim minimum permanent capital standardfor each of the years between 1988 and 1993. The interim minimum permanentcapital standard for each of the following years shall be equal to:<ITAG tagnum="25">For 1988_the beginning capital ratio;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">1989_the beginning capital ratio plus the increment;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">1990_the beginning capital ratio plus (2 times the increment);</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">1991_the beginning capital ratio plus (3 times the increment);</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">1992_the beginning capital ratio plus (4 times the increment);</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">1993_7 percent.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 615.5210</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Computation of the permanent capital ratio. </ITAG>(a) The institution's permanent capital ratio shall be determined on thebasis of the financial statements of the institution prepared in accordancewith generally accepted accounting principles. (b) Through December 31, 1989, the institution's assets may be computedusing the average of the most recent 12 months' balances. Thereafter, theinstitution's asset base shall be computed using currently daily balances.(c) The institution's permanent capital ratio shall be calculated by dividingthe institution's permanent capital, adjusted in accordance with paragraph(d) of this section (the numerator), by the risk-adjusted asset base (thedenominator), to derive a ratio expressed as a percentage.(d) For the sole purpose of computing the institution's permanent capitalratio, the following adjustments shall be made prior to assigning assetsto risk-weight categories and computing the ratio: (1) Where two Farm Credit System institutions have stock investments ineach other, such reciprocal holdings shall be eliminated to the extentof the offset. If the investments are equal in amount, each institutionshall deduct from its assets and its permanent capital an amount equalto the investment. If the investment are not equal in amount, each institutionshall deduct from its permanent capital and its assets an amount equalto the smaller investment. (2) Where an institution (except the Leasing Corporation or the CentralBank for Cooperatives) is owned by another Farm Credit System institutionthat is a direct lender, the double counting of capital shall be eliminatedby deducting from the permanent capital of the owned institution any investmentof the direct lender not eliminated pursuant to paragraph (d)(1) of thissection. (3) Where an institution invests in another institution to capitalize aparticipation interest purchased by such other institution, the investinginstitution shall deduct from its permanent capital an amount equal toits investment in the participating institution. For the purpose of computingthe minimum permanent capital ratio, the FLB shall be considered a participatinginstitution and the FLBA shall be considered an investing institution.(4) The double counting of capital between the Leasing Corporation andits owner institutions shall be eliminated by reducing the permanent capitalof the owner institutions by 100 percent of their investment in the LeasingCorporation. (5) Each institution shall deduct from its permanent capital an amountequal to any goodwill acquired after May 12, 1988. Beginning on January1, 1993, each institution shall deduct from its permanent capital all goodwill,whenever acquired. (e) The risk-adjusted assets base (denominator) shall be determined inthe following manner: (1) Each asset on the institution's balance sheet and each off-balance-sheetitem, adjusted by the appropriate credit conversion factor in paragraph(e)(3) of this section, shall be assigned to one of five risk categoriesin accordance with this section. The aggregate dollar value of the assetsin each category shall be multiplied by the percentage weight assignedto that category. The sum of the weighted dollar values from each of thefive risk categories shall comprise the denominator for computation ofthe permanent capital ratio. (2) Balance sheet assets shall be assigned to the percentage risk categoriesas follows: (i) <T3>Category 1: 0 Percent. </T3>(A) Cash on hand and demand balances heldin domestic and foreign banks. (B) Claims on Federal Reserve Banks. (C) Goodwill acquired after May 12, 1988. (D) Beginning 1993, all goodwill, whenever acquired. (ii) <T3>Category 2: 10 percent. </T3>(A) All securities issued by the U.S.Government and Government agencies. (B) Cash items in the process of collection. (C) Portions of loans and other assets collateralized by securities ofthe U.S Government or Government agencies. (D) Securities and other claims guaranteed by the U.S. Government or Governmentagencies (including portions of claims guaranteed). (iii) <T3>Category 3: 20 percent.</T3> (A) Loans and other assets collateralizedby U.S. Government-sponsored agency securities. (B) Claims on foreign banks with an original maturity of 1 year or less.(C) Claims on domestic banks (exclusive of demand balances). (D) Investments in State and local government obligations backed by the``full faith and credit of State or local government.'' (E) Claims on official multinational lending institutions or regional developmentinstitutions in which the U.S. Government is a shareholder or contributor. (F) Obligations of and investments in Farm Credit institutions. (iv) <T3>Category 4: 50 percent. </T3>(A) All other investment securities withmaturities under 1 year. (v) <T3>Category 5: 100 percent. </T3>(A) All other claims on private obligors.(B) Claims on foreign banks with original maturity greater than 1 year.(C) All other assets not specified above, including but not limited to,leases, fixed assets, and receivables. (D) Until 1993, goodwill acquired before May 12, 1988. (3) Off-Balance-Sheet Items. (i) The dollar amount of off-balance-sheet items that shall be assignedto a risk-weight category for inclusion in the denominator shall be determinedby multiplying the face amount of the item by the appropriate credit conversionfactor set forth in paragraph (b) of this section. The resulting amountshall be then assigned to the appropriate risk-weight category describedin paragraph (e)(2) of this section on the basis of the type of obligor.(ii) Credit conversion factors shall be applied to off-balance-sheet itemsas follows: (A) <T3>0 Percent. </T3>(<T3>1</T3>) Unused commitments with an original maturity of 1 year or less.(B) <T3>20 Percent. </T3>(<T3>1</T3>) Short-term, self-liquidating, trade-related contingencies,including but not limited to, commercial letters of credit.(C) <T3>50 Percent. (</T3><T3>1</T3>) Transaction-related contingencies (e.g. bid bonds, performancebonds, warranties, and standby letters of credit related to a particulartransaction). (<T3>2</T3>) Unused commitments with an original maturity exceeding 1 year,including underwriting commitments and commercial credit lines.(<T3>3</T3>) revolving underwriting facilities (RUFs), note issuance facilities(NIFs) and other similar arrangements. (D) <T3>100 Percent. </T3>(<T3>1</T3>) Direct credit substitutes (general guarantees of indebtedness,including standby letters of credit serving as financial guarantees forloans and securities). (<T3>2</T3>) Acquisitions of risk participations in bankers acceptancesand participations in direct credit substitutes (e.g. standby letters ofcredit). (<T3>3</T3>) Sale and repurchase agreements and asset sales with recourse,if not already included on the balance sheet. (<T3>4</T3>) Forward agreements (i.e., contractual obligations) to purchaseassests, including financing facilities with certain drawdown. (iii) Credit equivalents of interest rate contracts and foreign exchangecontracts (except single currency floating/floating interest rate swaps)shall be determined by adding the replacement cost (mark-to-market value,if positive) to the potential future credit exposure, determined by multiplyingthe national principal amount by the following credit conversion factorsas appropriate. <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s20,7.1,9</C> <H1>Remaining maturity </H1><H1>Interest rate contracts </H1><H1>Exchange rate contracts</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Less than 1-year <D>0</D><D>1.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1 Year and over <D>0.5 </D><D>5.0</D></ITAG></ITAG>(iv) Creidt equivalents of single currency floating/floating interest rateswaps shall be determined by their replacement cost (mark-to-market).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 615.5215</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Distribution of earnings.</ITAG>The boards of directors of System institutions may not reduce the permanentcapital of the institution through the payment of patronage refunds ordividends, or the retirement of stock or allocated equities if, after ordue to the action, the permanent capital of the insitution would fail tomeet the minimum permanent capital adequacy standard established underregulation andSection; 615.5210 for that period. This limitation shall notapply to the payment of noncash patronage refunds by any institution exemptfrom Federal income tax if the entire refund paid qualifies as permanentcapital. Any System institution subject to Federal income tax may pay patronagerefunds partially in cash if the cash portion of the refund is the minimumamount required to qualify the refund as a deductible patronage distributionfor Federal income tax purposes and the remaining portion of the refundpaid qualifies as permanent capital. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart I_[Removed and Reserved]</ITAG>3. Subpart I, andSection;andSection; 615.5220 to 615.5240, is removed and reserved.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 618_GENERAL PROVISIONS</ITAG>4. The authority citation for Part 618 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>12 U.S.C. 2183, 2243, 2244, 2252.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart J_Internal Controls </ITAG>5. Subpart J is amended by adding a new andSection; 618.8440 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 618.8440</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Annual budgets and projections. </ITAG>(a) The board of directors of each Farm Credit System insitution shalladopt and approve an operational and strategic business plan, completednot later than 30 days after the commncement of each calendar year. (b) The plan, at a minimum, shall address the operations of the institutionfor a minimum of 3 years and shall cover a minimum of the following areas:(1) A mission statement, which describes how the institution intends tomeet the long-term needs of its customers, creditors, stockholders, andemployees. (2) A review of the internal and extenal factors which are likely to effectthe institution during the planning horizon. (3) The establishment of quantifiable goals and objectives which must address,at a minimum, the areas of capitalization, asset quality, loan volume,profitability, operating expenses, marketing, human resources, liquidity,and, where applicable, interest rate risk. (4) Action plans which evidence how goals are planned to be acheived. Theseaction plans must include, at a minimum, a description of the proposedactions, a cost/benefit analysis, specific implementation schedules, andan assignment of individual responsibilities.(c) Each plan will include pro forma financial statements for each yearof the plan and a detailed monthly operating budget for the first yearof the plan. (d) Each System institution shall have a board of directors approved policywhich outlines the steps and process for completing the plan. This policymust include, at a minimum, the establishing of overall timetables fordeveloping the plan, the assignment of accountability for the overall planningprocess, and the establishment of monitoring, control, and reporting processesfor measuring performance under the plan.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: May 4, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">David A. Hill, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary Farm Credit Administration Board </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-10185 Filed 5-11-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6705-01-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>